New York, session 2025-2026, S5807.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 21-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. (a) Any companion website or mobile application associated with an 4 electronic benefit transfer system implemented pursuant to this section 5 that is accessible by benefit recipients shall be made available in the 6 twelve most common non-English languages spoken by limited-English 7 proficient individuals in the state, based on data in the most recent 8 American Community Survey published by the United States Census Bureau. 9 (b) Any companion website or mobile application associated with an 10 electronic benefit transfer system implemented pursuant to this section 11 that is accessible by benefit recipients shall provide for the trans- 12 lation of any documents made available for viewing on such companion 13 website or mobile application in the twelve most common non-English 14 languages spoken by limited-English proficient individuals in the state, 15 based on data in the most recent American Community Survey published by 16 the United States Census Bureau. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 19 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 20 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 21 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05621-06-5